Missouri, session 2026, HB3255.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 354, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto twenty-one new
sections, to be known as sections 354.750, 354.753, 354.756, 354.759, 354.762, 354.765,
354.768, 354.769, 354.770, 354.771, 354.774, 354.777, 354.780, 354.783, 354.786, 354.789,
354.792, 354.795, 354.807, 354.810, and 354.813, to read as follows:
354.750. 1. Sections 354.750 to 354.813 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Universal Health Assurance Program".
2. The Missouri universal health assurance program is hereby created for the
purpose of providing a publicly financed statewide program to provide comprehensive
necessary health, mental health, and dental health care services, including preventive
screenings, for all residents of this state. The program shall have as its goals:
(1) Timely access to health care services of the highest quality for every resident
of the state so that all may benefit;
(2) The provision of adequate funding for health care; and
(3) Lower health care spending through streamlined administration, a single bill,
and uniform payments.
3. As used in sections 354.750 to 354.813, the following terms mean:
(1) "Board", the board of governors of the Missouri universal health assurance
program;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3255 2
(2) "Eligible person", any person who qualifies for benefits under section
354.783;
(3) "Fund", the Missouri health care trust fund;
(4) "Participating provider", any person who is authorized to furnish services
under the provisions of sections 354.750 to 354.813 and under rules adopted by the
board of governors of the Missouri universal health assurance program;
(5) "Program", the Missouri universal health assurance program.
354.753. The Missouri universal health assurance program shall be a body
corporate and an instrumentality of the state. In the program shall be vested the powers
and duties specified in sections 354.750 to 354.813 and those powers necessary to enable
the program and the program's officers, employees, and agents to carry out the
purposes of sections 354.750 to 354.813.
354.756. 1. The director of the department of health and senior services shall
divide the population of the state into six regional health planning and policy
development districts of roughly equal population. An advisory council in each district
shall:
(1) Assist the board in the development of a comprehensive state health care
plan under section 354.765 and in the development of budgetary allocations for health
care services and of operating policies and procedures for the program; and
(2) Develop a transportation plan to enable indigents, elderly persons, and
persons with disabilities to have access to nonemergency health care services.
2. Not later than thirty days after the first meeting of the board of governors
appointed under section 354.759, the board shall submit to the governor a list of names
of qualified persons who reside in each of the six regional health planning and policy
development districts. From such list, the governor shall appoint to each district an
advisory council composed of the following nine members:
(1) Two physicians;
(2) One registered nurse;
(3) One licensed health care provider who is neither a physician nor a registered
nurse;
(4) One dentist;
(5) One medical director of a mental health facility;
(6) One municipal or county public health administrator;
(7) One person with a physical disability; and
(8) One professional consumer advocate.
3. The terms of the initial appointees to each of the district advisory councils
shall be as follows: four shall be appointed for a term of four years, three for a term of

HB 3255 3
three years, and two for a term of two years. Thereafter, all terms shall be for four
years, but any member appointed to fill a vacancy in an unexpired term shall serve only
for the remainder of that term. No member shall be appointed to serve more than two
consecutive terms.
354.759. 1. The Missouri universal health assurance program shall be
administered by a board of governors composed of twenty-three members:
(1) Fourteen of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and
consent of the senate as follows:
(a) One representative of a hospital;
(b) Two physicians;
(c) One registered nurse;
(d) One epidemiologist;
(e) One representative of a community health center;
(f) One mental health care provider;
(g) One professional consumer advocate;
(h) Two persons whose annual income does not exceed twice the federal poverty
level;
(i) One person sixty-five years of age or older;
(j) One person who is a licensed health care professional other than a physician
or a nurse;
(k) One person trained in bioethics; and
(l) One dentist;
(2) Six of whom shall represent the regional health planning and policy
development districts established under section 354.756, appointed by the director of the
department of health and senior services; and
(3) Three of whom shall be the following ex officio members:
(a) The director of the department of health and senior services;
(b) The director of the department of social services; and
(c) The director of the department of mental health.
2. The terms of the initial members who are appointed under subdivision (1) of
subsection 1 of this section shall be staggered as follows: five shall be appointed for a
term of four years, five for a term of three years, and four for a term of two years. The
initial terms of the members selected under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section
shall be staggered so that the members selected from even-numbered districts shall
serve an initial term of three years and those from odd-numbered districts shall serve
four years. Thereafter, all terms shall be for four years, but a member appointed to fill

HB 3255 4
a vacancy in an unexpired term shall serve only for the remainder of that term. No
member shall be appointed to serve more than two consecutive terms.
3. Members of the board shall at all times include:
(1) Sufficient representatives of racial, ethnic, and gender diversity so that the
makeup of the board shall accurately reflect the racial, ethnic, and gender diversity of
the state population; and
(2) At least two members who are defined as disabled under the Americans with
Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101 et seq.
4. The board shall elect a chair and vice chair.
5. Meetings shall be called by the chair or by any thirteen members. The board
shall meet at least six times per year. All meetings of the board shall be announced in
advance and open to the public, except as provided by chapter 610.
6. Thirteen members of the board constitute a quorum, and an affirmative vote
of at least thirteen members shall be necessary for any action to be taken by the board.
7. The members of the board shall be reimbursed from the Missouri health care
trust fund for mileage and any necessary and actual expenses incurred while engaged in
the business of the board.
354.762. 1. The board of governors of the Missouri universal health assurance
program shall be responsible for:
(1) Establishing budget and policy guidelines for the program through the
development of a comprehensive state health care plan under section 354.765;
(2) Establishing fee schedules using the last available calendar year as a base
year;
(3) Determining aggregate capital expenditures in keeping with the goals
established under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section 354.765;
(4) Approving additions to services offered by the program;
(5) Administering and implementing the program and administering the
Missouri health care trust fund created under section 354.770;
(6) Adopting rules under chapter 536;
(7) Monitoring the operation of the program;
(8) Studying means of incorporating institutional long-term care benefits into
the program, studying immigration into the state for the purpose of receiving health
care services under the program, and reporting on the progress of such studies to the
speaker of the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of the senate, and the
governor;
(9) Reporting annually to the speaker of the house of representatives, the
president pro tempore of the senate, and the governor on the program's activities and

HB 3255 5
recommending any changes to insurance and health care laws to improve access to
health care for residents of this state;
(10) Disseminating to providers of services and to the public information
concerning the program and the persons eligible to receive the benefits of the program;
(11) Conducting necessary investigations and inquiries and compelling the
submission of information, documents, and records the board considers necessary to
carry out its duties under the provisions of sections 354.750 to 354.813;
(12) Conducting utilization reviews of patients and providers to identify abuses
of the program and reporting abuses to state agencies;
(13) Employing and supervising staff;
(14) Conducting other activities the board considers necessary to carry out the
purposes of sections 354.750 to 354.813;
(15) Establishing standards and procedures for negotiating and entering into
contracts with participating providers; and
(16) Initiating and responding to lawsuits.
2. The board, after providing notice to consumers, providers, the director of the
department of health and senior services, and other interested parties, may hold
hearings in connection with any action that it proposes to take under subsection 1 of this
section. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the board to adopt
rules under subdivision (6) or (15) of subsection 1 of this section or to conduct
evaluations or investigations under subdivision (11) of subsection 1 of this section
without holding public hearings.
354.765. 1. The board, in cooperation with the district advisory councils
established under section 354.756, shall annually develop a comprehensive state health
care plan. The plan shall include the following:
(1) A comprehensive budget for the program within the limits of funds made
available through the measures instituted in sections 354.750 to 354.813. The budget
shall include specific amounts to be allocated respectively to:
(a) The health services account established under section 354.774;
(b) The prescribed medications and durable and nondurable medical equipment
account established under section 354.774;
(c) The regional capital improvement account established under section 354.774;
(d) The health professional education and training fund established under
section 354.777; and
(e) Administration of the program in an amount not to exceed four percent of
the total funds available to the program;

HB 3255 6
(2) Specific goals for the total portion of funds in the health services account to
be expended for the capital needs of providers under section 354.792;
(3) An evaluation of the health care and mental health needs of the state and of
each regional health planning and policy development district including, but not limited
to, assessments of:
(a) Regional needs and other investments in health care equipment and capital
improvements;
(b) The effectiveness of state and local efforts to coordinate the activities of the
health care delivery system; and
(c) Any other unmet local health care or mental health needs;
(4) Goals for geographic distribution of health care providers and personnel,
with strategies for using the authority over reimbursements under section 354.792 and
resources from the health professional education and training fund established in
section 354.777 to achieve such goals;
(5) Quantitative goals for the use of health and mental health services by eligible
persons;
(6) Specific goals for the physical and mental health status of Missourians and
for quality of care rendered under the program; and
(7) An evaluation of the adequacy of total funds available to the program.
2. Prior to promulgation of the comprehensive state health care plan, the board
shall:
(1) Appoint a subcommittee of experts in medical and health care ethics to
advise the board on the ethical issues relating to the allocation of health care resources;
(2) Appoint a subcommittee of licensed physicians, registered nurses, and
registered pharmacists to establish an evidence-based system formulary for all
prescription drugs and durable and nondurable medical equipment used by the
Missouri health care system;
(3) Instruct each district advisory council to conduct at least one public hearing
in at least two areas of its region to gather public comment on the proposed plan. The
board shall provide the district advisory councils with staff assistance in conducting
such hearings; and
(4) Hold at least two public hearings to gather public comment on the proposed
plan.
3. The comprehensive state health care plan shall, to the extent practicable, seek
to assure the most cost-effective delivery of health care by reflecting the following
priorities:
(1) Quality of care to be achieved through the following:

HB 3255 7
(a) Primary and preventive services;
(b) Accountability of providers to payers and consumers for both the outcomes
and consumer acceptability of the care they render;
(c) Continuity of care, as embodied in coordination of services to individuals and
the community; and
(d) Maintenance of high levels of professional competence and expertise among
health care providers according to professional practice standards;
(2) Access to care through the equitable distribution of resources within the
health care delivery system on the basis of community need; and
(3) Efficient use of resources through:
(a) Elimination of unnecessary administrative and overhead expenses;
(b) Elimination of means testing;
(c) Establishment of cost-containment pricing for reimbursements to
manufacturers of pharmaceuticals and manufacturers of durable and nondurable
medical equipment; and
(d) Innovative and cost-effective models of care including, but not limited to:
a. Community, nonmedical, or in-home services that provide alternatives to
institutional long-term care;
b. Community health nursing;
c. Services provided by nurse practitioners; and
d. Psychiatric and other mental health services provided on an outpatient basis.
354.768. The board of governors of the Missouri universal health assurance
program shall appoint the executive director of the program.
354.769. 1. The executive director of the program shall serve as secretary to the
board and shall perform such duties in the administration of the program as the board
may assign.
2. The board may delegate to the executive director any of the board's functions
or duties under sections 354.750 to 354.813, except the issuance of rules and the
determination of the program.
354.770. The board shall administer the "Missouri Health Care Trust Fund",
which is hereby created in the state treasury, into which shall be placed all federal
payments received as a result of any waiver of requirements granted by the United
States Secretary of Health and Human Services under health care programs established
under Title XVIII and Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended, and all moneys
appropriated by the general assembly to the program under sections 354.750 to 354.813.
Moneys in the fund shall be used for comprehensive necessary health care services and
to support construction, renovation, and equipping of health care institutions based on

HB 3255 8
regional needs in accordance with sections 354.750 to 354.813 and rules established by
the board of governors of the program and for no other purpose. The board shall have
power, in the name and on behalf of the program, to purchase, acquire, hold, lend, lease,
sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of all property and rights, and enter into written
contracts, all as may be necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of sections
354.750 to 354.813.
354.771. 1. All moneys received by or belonging to the program shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the Missouri health care trust fund. No
such moneys shall be deposited in, or be retained by, any bank or trust company that
does not have on deposit at the time the kind and value of collateral required by sections
30.240 and 30.270 for depositories of the state treasurer. The executive director shall be
responsible for all property belonging to the program and shall give such corporate
surety bonds for the faithful handling of the property as the board shall require.
2. The board of governors shall administer the fund and shall conduct a
quarterly review of the expenditures from and revenues received by the fund.
3. The board shall submit each quarterly review to the state auditor for
oversight.
4. The state treasurer may invest funds of the program as permitted by law.
5. The amount of reserves in the fund at any time shall equal at least the amount
of expenditures from the fund during the three preceding months.
354.774. 1. The "Health Services Account" is hereby created within the
Missouri health care trust fund. Moneys in the health services account shall be used
solely to pay participating providers in accordance with section 354.792.
2. The "Prescribed Medications and Durable and Nondurable Medical
Equipment Account" is hereby created within the Missouri health care trust fund.
Moneys in the account shall be used solely for medications and durable and nondurable
medical equipment prescribed by participating physicians in accordance with section
354.792.
3. The "Regional Capital Improvement Account" is hereby created within the
Missouri health care trust fund. Moneys in the account shall be used solely to pay for
medical technology and capital improvements needed in regions to improve access to
health care resources in accordance with section 354.792.
354.777. 1. There is hereby created within the state treasury the "Health
Professional Education and Training Fund", which shall consist of all moneys received
from federal health professional training moneys and any other funds so allocated by
the board under section 354.765. Upon appropriation by the general assembly, moneys

HB 3255 9
in the health professional education and training fund shall be used by the board solely
to pay for the education and training of health professionals.
2. During the five-year period commencing on January first following the
effective date of this section, the annual amount of state expenditures for the education
and training of health professionals shall not be reduced below the level of such
expenditures in the previous calendar year.
354.780. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, the
moneys in the health care trust fund at the end of any biennium shall not be transferred
and placed to the credit of the general revenue fund.
354.783. 1. Every person, regardless of preexisting conditions, who is a resident
of this state is eligible to receive services under the Missouri universal health assurance
program. No person eligible for services under the Missouri universal health assurance
program who receives services from a participating provider shall be charged an
additional amount for such services.
2. If a person who is not a resident of the state of Missouri receives medical
treatment in Missouri, the state of Missouri is subrogated to the right to reimbursement
from any third-party payer for such medical treatment.
354.786. 1. Every person who is eligible to receive services under the program
under section 354.783 is entitled to receive benefits for any covered service furnished
within this state by a participating provider if the service is deemed by the patient and
participating provider to be necessary or appropriate for the maintenance of physical or
mental health or for the diagnosis or treatment of, or rehabilitation following, injury,
disability, or disease.
2. Health care services include, but are not limited to, all services provided under
section 208.152 and those community, nonmedical, or in-home services that provide an
alternative to institutional long-term care, except for:
(1) Surgery for cosmetic purposes other than for reconstructive surgery;
(2) Medical examinations conducted and medical reports prepared for either of
the following purposes:
(a) Purchasing or renewing life insurance; or
(b) Participating as a plaintiff or defendant in a civil action for the recovery or
settlement of damages; and
(3) Custodial care rendered in a nursing home. As used in this subdivision, the
term "custodial care" means nonmedical services provided in a residential care facility,
as defined in section 198.006.

HB 3255 10
354.789. 1. No participating provider shall refuse to furnish services under the
program to an eligible person on the basis of race, color, income level, national origin,
religion, sex, sexual orientation, or other nonmedical criteria.
2. An eligible person may choose any participating provider.
3. Every participating provider shall furnish such information as may be
reasonably required by the board of governors of the program for utilization review, for
the making of payments, and for statistical or other studies of the operation of the
program.
4. Every participating provider shall permit the board of governors to examine
the provider's records as may be necessary for verification of payment.
5. Physicians and other participating providers shall practice according to state
and federal laws and according to their accepted professional standards.
6. The Missouri universal health assurance program shall reimburse health care
providers that are located outside this state at reasonable rates for required emergency
medical care rendered to eligible persons.
354.792. 1. The Missouri universal health assurance program shall pay the
expenses of institutional providers of inpatient services on the basis of global budgets
that are approved by the board of governors of the program. Such global budgets shall
include necessary construction, renovation, or equipment so long as the board has
determined that such construction, renovation, or equipment will directly enhance
public access to quality health care.
2. Each institutional provider shall negotiate an annual budget with the program
to cover its anticipated services for the next year based on past performance and
projected changes in prices and service levels and provide a reasonable margin above
operating expenses in order to provide for capital depreciation and other long-term
needs of the institution.
3. Every physician or other provider employed by a globally budgeted
institutional provider shall be paid through and in a manner determined by the
institutional provider.
4. The program shall reimburse independent providers of health care services on
a fee-for-service basis using the federal Medicare reimbursement fees as a guideline.
The program shall annually negotiate the fee schedule with the appropriate professional
group. The fee schedule shall be applied to health care services rendered by
independent providers throughout the state. The appropriate professional group to
negotiate the fee schedule shall be the professional association chosen by election of
members of each health care profession.

HB 3255 11
5. A provider shall not charge rates that are higher than the negotiated
reimbursement level and shall not charge separately for services under section 354.786.
6. In any instance in which the health care provider or the professional group
negotiating for the provider is unable to negotiate an annual budget or a fee schedule
with the program, the annual budget or the fee schedule set by the board shall be
presumed to be correct and a final administrative decision, which may be appealed in
the circuit court of Cole County.
7. Policies and rules of institutional providers shall be consistent with state and
federal laws and with accepted medical and professional standards of care.
354.795. 1. It is unlawful for a private health insurer to sell health insurance
coverage that duplicates the benefits provided under sections 354.750 to 354.813.
Nothing in sections 354.750 to 354.813 shall be construed as prohibiting insurers,
employers, or other plans from offering benefits that do not duplicate services that are
offered by the Missouri universal health assurance program.
2. Investor-ownership of health delivery facilities, including but not limited to
hospitals, health maintenance organizations, nursing homes, and clinics, is unlawful.
Investor-owners of health delivery facilities at the time of the effective date of this
section shall be compensated for the loss of their facilities but not for loss of business
opportunities or for administrative capacity not used by the program.
354.807. Not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section, the
department of social services shall:
(1) Apply to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services for all
waivers of requirements under health care programs established under Title XVIII and
Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended, that are necessary to enable this state
to deposit all federal payments under such programs to the credit of the Missouri health
care trust fund created in section 354.770; and
(2) Identify any other federal programs that provide federal funds for payment
of health care services to individuals. The department shall comply with any
requirements under those programs and apply for any waivers of those requirements
that are necessary to enable this state to deposit such federal funds to the credit of the
Missouri health care trust fund.
354.810. Not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section, the
governor and the director of the department of health and senior services shall make the
initial appointments to the board of governors of the Missouri universal health
assurance program under section 354.759.
354.813. The board of governors of the Missouri universal health assurance
program shall request that the program established under the provisions of sections

HB 3255 12
354.750 to 354.813 be approved for federal employees and retirees while they are
residents of the state of Missouri.
Section B. The enactment of sections 354.750 and 354.753 and sections 354.762 to
354.795 of this act shall be effective April first of the year following the notice to the revisor
of statutes that a waiver has been obtained from the Secretary of the Department of Health
and Human Services by the director of the department of social services based on a request
filed under section 354.807 of this act.
✔